Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.210

Advance payment of travel expenses—Director of financial management to prescribe rules and regulations to carry out RCW 43.03.150 through 43.03.210.

The director of financial management may prescribe rules and regulations to assist in carrying out the purposes of RCW 43.03.150 through 43.03.210 including regulation of travel by officers and employees and the conditions under which per diem and mileage shall be paid, so as to improve efficiency and conserve funds and to insure proper use and accountability of travel advances strictly in the public interest and for public purposes only.

[ 1979 c 151 s 88; 1967 ex.s. c 16 s 12.]